ru: Стандарты точности цветопередачи: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Другое
ro-RO: Standarde de precizie a culorilor: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Altele
zh-TW: 色彩準確度標準: Adobe RGB; 倫敦大學學院; CIE RGB; 國際照明協會 XYZ; CIE 實驗室; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; 彩通; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; 其他
cs: Standardy přesnosti barev: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Jiné
sl-SI: Standardi barvne natančnosti: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE-lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Drugo
pt-BR: Padrões de precisão de cores: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Outro
fr: Normes de précision des couleurs: Adobe RVB; CIE LCh; CIE RVB; CIE XYZ; Laboratoire CIE; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Autre
sk-SK: Normy presnosti farieb: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE laboratórium; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Iné
nl: Kleurnauwkeurigheidsnormen: Adobe-RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Andere
pt-PT: Padrões de precisão de cores: Adobe RGB; CIELCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIELAB; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Outro
da: Standarder for farvenøjagtighed: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Andet
fi: Värien tarkkuusstandardit: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Muu
zh-CN: 色彩准确度标准: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE LAB; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; 潘通; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; 其他
tr: Renk Doğruluğu Standartları: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Diğer
el: Πρότυπα ακρίβειας χρώματος: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Άλλο
es: Estándares de precisión del color: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Otros
hu: Színpontossági szabványok: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE Lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Egyéb
ko: 색상 정확도 표준: 어도비 RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE Lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; 팬톤; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; 기타
it: Standard di precisione del colore: AdobeRGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIEXYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Altro
pl: Standardy dokładności kolorów: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rekomendacja 2020; Rekomendacja 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Inne
hr-HR: Standardi točnosti prikaza boja: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Ostalo
vi: Tiêu chuẩn về độ chính xác màu: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Khác
th: มาตรฐานความแม่นยำของสี: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; อื่นๆ
de: Farbgenauigkeitsstandards: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIELAB; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Стандарти за точност на цветовете: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Други
en: Color accuracy standards: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Other
ja: 色精度基準: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; その他
nb: Standarder for fargenøyaktighet: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Annet
lt-LT: Spalvų tikslumo standartai: „Adobe RGB“; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE lab; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; „Pantone“; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Kita
sv: Standarder för färgnoggrannhet: Adobe RGB; CIE LCh; CIE RGB; CIE XYZ; CIE-labb; DCI-P3; DICOM; EBU; NTSC; PAL; Pantone; Rec. 2020; Rec. 709; SMPTE-C; sRGB; Övrigt